California statutes. Education Code
(4) Except for school districts that meet the requirements for financial hardship pursuant to Section 17075.10, a school district shall provide 25 percent of the cost of the project, whether the project is for new construction or retrofit, if the school district does either of the following:

(A) Converts a part-day kindergarten program to a full-day kindergarten program. A school district that was awarded a grant from funds appropriated pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and met the requirements of this paragraph shall have its grant amount adjusted from funds appropriated pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) to reflect the requirements of this paragraph.

(B) Commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year, offers, or expands enrollment in, a California state preschool program or transitional kindergarten program.

(5) (A) A school district seeking a transitional kindergarten or full-day kindergarten facilities grant from moneys in the California Preschool, Transitional Kindergarten, and Full-Day Kindergarten Facilities Account shall provide the Office of Public School
 Construction with schoolsite enrollment data for the year in which its application is processed and the three immediately preceding years. The Office of Public School Construction shall use this data to verify the schoolsite’s overall need for funding pursuant to this section based on the schoolsite’s enrollment patterns. As part of this verification, the Office of Public School Construction, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall determine if the schoolsite’s need for funding shall be limited to retrofit projects.

(B) For a school district seeking a new construction grant for preschool classrooms from moneys in the California Preschool, Transitional Kindergarten, and Full-Day Kindergarten Facilities Account, the school district shall demonstrate that its existing classrooms, including outdoor play areas and equipment, are insufficient to meet the needs of providing preschool, and that the school district’s projected
 enrollment in the preschool program exceeds the current preschool program classroom capacity at the applicable schoolsite. A school district shall use both of the following to demonstrate enrollment for purposes of determining eligibility:

(i) The most recent childcare needs assessment conducted by its regional local planning council for preschool age children.

(ii) A current or future contract with the State Department of Education to operate a preschool program.

(6) A school district, county office of education, or community college district seeking a preschool facilities grant shall hold title to the real property where the facilities will be located.

(c) The State Allocation Board shall disburse grant funds to school districts with approved
 applications for new construction or retrofit projects, to the extent funds are available for the state’s applicable matching share, if the school district has provided its applicable local matching share, unless the school district meets the requirements for financial hardship pursuant to Section 17075.10, and upon certification by the school district that the school district has entered into a binding contract for completion of the approved project.

(d) The State Allocation Board shall allocate funds to school districts using the same maximum grant eligibility amounts that are used for purposes of the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10), as set forth in Sections 17072.10 and 17072.11 for new construction, and as set forth in Section 17074.10 for retrofit projects.

(e) As a condition of receiving grant funds
 pursuant to this section, and before the release of those funds, the school district shall do all of the following:

(1) Execute and submit a grant agreement consistent with the applicable sections of the grant agreement specified in Section 1859.90.4 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) For a school district applying for grant funds for a transitional kindergarten facilities project, pass a resolution at a public meeting of the governing board of the school district stating the school district’s intent to offer, or expand enrollment in, a transitional kindergarten program.

(3) For a school district applying for grant funds for a California state preschool program facilities project, pass a resolution at a public meeting of the governing board of the school district stating the school district’s
 intent to expand enrollment in a preschool program and apply for expanded program service funding, and certify that the school district has or will apply for a contract to operate a preschool program before occupying the to-be-constructed or retrofitted facility.

(f) (1) A school district may use grant funds awarded for new construction on costs necessary to adequately house preschool, transitional kindergarten, and kindergarten pupils in an approved project, which shall include only the following:

(A) The costs of design, engineering, testing, inspections, plan checking, construction management, site acquisition and development, evaluation and response action costs relating to hazardous substances at a new or existing schoolsite, demolition, construction, landscaping, necessary utility costs, utility connections and other related fees, equipment including
 telecommunication equipment to increase school security, furnishings, the upgrading of electrical systems, and the wiring or cabling of classrooms in order to accommodate educational technology.

(B) The costs of acquiring an existing government-owned or privately owned building, or a privately financed school building, and the necessary costs of converting the government-owned or privately owned building for public school use.

(2) (A) A school district may use grant funds awarded for a retrofit project to retrofit an existing school facility to adequately house preschool, transitional kindergarten, and kindergarten pupils, which shall only include the costs of design, engineering, testing, inspection, plan checking, construction management, demolition, construction, necessary utility costs, utility connection and other related fees, the purchase and
 installation of air-conditioning equipment and insulation materials and related costs, furniture and equipment, including telecommunication equipment to increase school security, fire safety improvements, playground safety improvements, the identification, assessment, or abatement of hazardous asbestos, seismic safety improvements, the upgrading of electrical systems, and the wiring or cabling of classrooms in order to accommodate educational technology.

(B) Grant funds awarded for a retrofit project shall not be used for costs associated with acquisition and development of real property or for routine maintenance and repair.

(3) A school district shall not use funds to purchase or install portable classrooms. For purposes of this article, “portable classroom” means a classroom building of one or more stories that is designed and constructed to be relocatable and transportable
 over public streets, and for a single-story portable classroom, is designed and constructed for relocation without the separation of the roof or floor from the building and when measured at the most exterior walls, has a floor area that does not exceed 2,000 square feet.

(g) For a modernization grant pursuant to this article to retrofit an existing preschool classroom, including outdoor play areas and installed equipment, the applicable classroom shall comply with all of the following:

(1) The Field Act, as set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365).

(2) The California Building Standards Code, as set forth in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) The regulations for early learning
 and care programs as set forth in Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 1 of Title 5 of, and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 101151) of Division 12 of Title 22 of, the California Code of Regulations, as applicable.

(4) Written approval from the State Department of Education that the building plans comply with the standards set forth in Subchapter 1 (commencing with Section 14001) of Chapter 13 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(h) The State Allocation Board may adopt regulations to implement this section. Any regulations adopted pursuant to this section may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary
 for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, a school district shall be subject, with regard to this section, to an audit conducted pursuant to Section 41024.

(j) The Office of Public School Construction shall report to the Director of Finance, and shall post on its internet website, information regarding the use of grant funds that have been made available to school districts during each fiscal year grant funds are disbursed pursuant to this section. A final report shall also be issued after projects have been audited pursuant to Section 41024 and any savings have been spent or returned to the state.

(k) The Department of General Services may charge its administrative costs against the California Preschool, Transitional Kindergarten,
 and Full-Day Kindergarten Facilities Account, which shall be subject to the approval of the Department of Finance and which shall not exceed 2.5 percent of the account. These administrative funds shall be subject to the encumbrance or expenditure availability for the appropriations described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(l) Funds made available to school districts pursuant to this article shall supplement, not supplant, existing funds available for school facilities construction.

(m) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Kindergarten” includes transitional kindergarten, as defined in Section 48000.

(2) “Preschool classroom” means a preschool classroom used or proposed to be used for instructional purposes in
 a California state preschool program.

(3) “Preschool program” means a full-day California state preschool program pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8207) of Chapter 2 of Part 6.

(4) “Schoolsite” or “site” means the project site for which the school district is applying for grants under this article.

(5) “School district” means as follows:

(A) For transitional kindergarten and full-day kindergarten facilities grants, “school district” means a school district.

(B) For preschool facilities grants, “school district” means a school district, county office of education, or a community college district that operates a preschool program on behalf of, or in lieu of, a school district
 or county office of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 8.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17376.

(a) If the board determines that a school district or county office of education is in default, or projected to default, with the requirements of any programs administered by the board, the board may withhold any new approvals for that school district or county office of education under this article. The board may require sufficient evidence from the applicant that a default or projected default has been addressed before making any new approvals.

(b) The withholding of any new approvals pursuant to this section shall not, in and of itself, make the board liable for any tort, breach of contract, or any other action for damages caused by an applicant arising from new construction or modernization by the applicant. These contracts include, but
 are not limited to, contracts between the applicant and its construction contractors, construction managers, architects, or engineers. The applicant shall be liable for all torts, breaches of contract, or any other actions for damages caused by the applicant.

(c) For purposes of this section, “new approvals” include, but are not limited to, unfunded approvals, apportionments, fund releases, and closeout audit adjustments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 36.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Property:  Sale,Lease, Exchange [17385. - 17561.]



  ARTICLE 1. Conveyances [17385. - 17386.]

17385.

The governing board of any school district shall receive in the name of the district conveyances for all property received and purchased by it, and shall make in the name of the district conveyances of all property belonging to the district and sold by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17386.

The governing board of any school district shall have the power to execute and deliver quitclaim deeds, either with or without consideration to the owners of real property adjacent to any real property owned by the school district, for the purpose of removing defects in and otherwise clearing up the title to such adjacent real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Advisory Committees [17387. - 17391.]

17387.

It is the intent of the Legislature that leases entered into pursuant to this chapter provide for community involvement by attendance area at the district level. This community involvement should facilitate making the best possible judgments about the use of excess school facilities in each individual situation.

It is the intent of the Legislature to have the community involved before decisions are made about school closure or the use of surplus space, thus avoiding community conflict and assuring building use that is compatible with the community’s needs and desires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17388.

The governing board of any school district may, and the governing board of each school district, prior to the sale, lease, or rental of any excess real property, except rentals not exceeding 30 days, shall, appoint a district advisory committee to advise the governing board in the development of districtwide policies and procedures governing the use or disposition of school buildings or space in school buildings which is not needed for school purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17389.

A school district advisory committee appointed pursuant to Section 17388 shall consist of not less than seven nor more than 11 members, and shall be representative of each of the following:

(a) The ethnic, age group, and socioeconomic composition of the district.

(b) The business community, such as store owners, managers, or supervisors.

(c) Landowners or renters, with preference to be given to representatives of neighborhood associations.

(d) Teachers.

(e) Administrators.

(f) Parents of students.

(g) Persons with expertise in environmental impact, legal contracts, building codes, and land use planning, including, but not limited to, knowledge of the zoning and other land use restrictions of the cities or cities and counties in which surplus space and real property is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17390.

The school district advisory committee shall do all of the following:

(a) Review the projected school enrollment and other data as provided by the district to determine the amount of surplus space and real property.

(b) Establish a priority list of use of surplus space and real property that will be acceptable to the community.

(c) Cause to have circulated throughout the attendance area a priority list of surplus space and real property and provide for hearings of community input to the committee on acceptable uses of space and real property, including the sale or lease of surplus real property for child care development purposes pursuant to Section 17458.

(d) Make a final determination of limits of tolerance of use of space and real property.

(e) Forward to the district governing board a report recommending uses of surplus space and real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17391.

Notwithstanding Section 17388, the governing board of a school district may elect not to appoint a school district advisory committee pursuant to Section 17388 in any of the following circumstances:

(a) A lease or rental of excess real property to a private educational institution for the purpose of offering summer school in a facility of the school district.

(b) The sale, lease, or rental of excess real property to be used for teacher or school district employee housing, including housing projects that comply with Section 65914.7 of the Government Code.

(c) Until July 1, 2024, the
 sale or lease of surplus real property that has not previously operated, or was not constructed to be operated, as an early childhood education facility or a school for elementary and secondary instruction, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 17463.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 503, Sec. 1.   (AB 1021)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Leasing Property [17400. - 17429.]

17400.

(a) Any school district may enter into leases and agreements relating to real property and buildings to be used by the school district pursuant to this article.

(b) As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Best value” means a competitive procurement process whereby the selected proposer is selected on the basis of objective criteria for evaluating the qualifications of proposers with the resulting selection representing the best combination of price and qualifications.

(2) “Best value
 score” means the total score awarded to a proposer for all scored evaluation factors.

(3) “Building” includes each of the following:

(A) One or more buildings located or to be located on one or more sites.

(B) The remodeling of any building located on a site to be leased pursuant to this article.

(C) Onsite and offsite facilities, utilities, or improvements that the governing board of the school district determines are necessary for the proper operation or function of the school facilities to be leased.

(D) The permanent improvement of school grounds.

(4) “Preconstruction services” means advice during the design phase including, but not limited to, scheduling, pricing, and phasing to assist the school district to design a more constructible project.

(5) “Site” includes one or more sites, and also may include any building or buildings located or to be located on a site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 521, Sec. 1.   (AB 2316)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

17401.

As used in this article “lease or agreement” shall include a lease-purchase agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17402.

Before the governing board of a school district enters into a lease or agreement pursuant to this article, it shall have available a site upon which a building to be used by the district may be constructed and shall have complied with the provisions of law relating to the selection and approval of sites, and it shall have prepared and shall have adopted plans and specifications for the building that have been approved pursuant to Sections 17280 to 17316, inclusive. A district has a site available for the purposes of this section under any of the following conditions:

(a) If it owns a site or if it has an option on a site that allows the school district or the designee of the district to purchase the site. Any school district may acquire and pay for an option containing such a provision.

(b) If it is acquiring a site by eminent domain proceedings and pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1255.010) of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the district has obtained an order for possession of the site, and the entire amount deposited with the court as the probable amount of compensation for the taking has been withdrawn.

(c) In the case of a district qualifying under Section 17410, if it is leasing a site from a governmental agency pursuant to a lease having an original term of 35 years or more or having an option to renew that, if exercised, would extend the term to at least 35 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17403.

The term of a lease or agreement entered into by a school district pursuant to this article shall not exceed 99 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 204, Sec. 1.   (AB 1406)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17404.

Sections 17455 to 17480, inclusive, shall not apply to leases made pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17405.

Any lease or agreement shall be subject to the following requirements:

(a) A building or structure that is to be used for school purposes shall be subject to the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365). A building or facility used by a school district under a lease or lease-purchase agreement into which neither pupils nor teachers are required to enter or that would be excluded from the definition of “school building,” as contained in Section 17368, shall not be considered to be a “school building” within the meaning of Section 17283.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to trailer coaches used for classrooms or laboratories if the trailer coaches conform to the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder concerning mobilehomes, are not expanded or fitted together with other sections to form one unit greater than 24 feet in width, are used for special educational purposes, and are used by not more than 12 pupils at a time, except that the trailer coaches may be used by not more than 20 pupils at a time for driver training purposes.

(c) The site on which a leased relocatable structure is located shall be owned by the school district, or shall be under the control of the school district pursuant to a lease or a permit.

“Relocatable structure” is any structure that is designed to be relocated.

(d) For purposes of interconnection of fire alarms, buildings leased for 24 months or less shall be subject to Section 809 of the Uniform Building Code until applicable regulations proposed by the State Fire Marshal are adopted as part of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall become operative on September 30, 1997.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, 2nd text) by Stats. 1997, Ch. 320, Sec. 4.   Effective August 18, 1997.   As amended, this section initially became operative on September 30, 1997, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 320 (and by its own provisions).)
-------------------------------------------

17406.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 17417, the governing board of a school district may let, for a minimum rental of one dollar ($1) a year, to a person, firm, or corporation real property that belongs to the school district if the instrument by which this property is let requires the lessee therein to construct on the demised premises, or provide for the construction thereon of, a building or buildings for the use of the school district during the term of the lease, and provides that title to that building shall vest in the school district at the expiration of that term. The instrument may provide for the means or methods by which that title shall vest in the school district before the expiration of that term, and shall contain other terms and conditions as the governing board of the school district may deem to
 be in the best interest of the school district.

(2) An instrument created pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be awarded based on a competitive solicitation process to the proposer providing the best value to the school district, taking into consideration the proposer’s demonstrated competence and professional qualifications necessary for the satisfactory performance of the services required. Before awarding an instrument pursuant to this section, the governing board of the school district shall adopt and publish required procedures and guidelines for evaluating the qualifications of proposers that ensure the best value selections by the school district are conducted in a fair and impartial manner. These procedures and guidelines shall be mandatory for the school district when awarding an instrument pursuant to this section. The required procedures shall include, at a minimum, the following:

(A) The school district shall prepare a request for sealed proposals from qualified proposers. The school district shall include in the request for sealed proposals an estimate of price of the project, a clear, precise description of any preconstruction services that may be required and the facilities to be constructed, the key elements of the instrument to be awarded, a description of the format that proposals shall follow and the elements they shall contain, the standards the school district will use in evaluating proposals, the date on which proposals are due, and the timetable the school district will follow in reviewing and evaluating proposals.

(B) The school district shall give notice of the request for sealed proposals in the manner of notice provided in Section 20112 of the Public Contract Code and in a trade paper of general circulation published in the county where the
 project is located, with the latest notice published at least 10 days before the date for receipt of the proposals.

(C) A proposer shall be prequalified in accordance with subdivisions (b) to (m), inclusive, of Section 20111.6 of the Public Contract Code in order to submit a proposal. If used, electrical, mechanical, and plumbing subcontractors shall be subject to the same prequalification requirements for prospective bidders described in subdivisions (b) to (m), inclusive, of Section 20111.6 of the Public Contract Code, including the requirement for the completion and submission of a standardized prequalification questionnaire and financial statement that is verified under oath and is not a public record. These prequalification requirements shall be included in an instrument created pursuant to paragraph (1).

(D) The request for sealed proposals shall identify all criteria that
 the school district will consider in evaluating the proposals and qualifications of the proposers, including relevant experience, safety record, price proposal, and other factors specified by the school district. The price proposal shall include, at the school district’s discretion, either a lump-sum price for the instrument to be awarded or the proposer’s proposed fee to perform the services requested, including the proposer’s proposed fee to perform preconstruction services or any other work related to the facilities to be constructed, as requested by the school district. The request for proposals shall specify whether each criterion will be evaluated pass-fail or will be scored as part of the best value score, and whether proposers must achieve any minimum qualification score for award of the instrument under this section.

(E) For each scored criterion, the school district shall identify the methodology and rating or weighting system that
 will be used by the school district in evaluating the criterion, including the weight assigned to the criterion and any minimum acceptable score.

(F) Proposals shall be evaluated and the instrument awarded under this section in the following manner:

(i) All proposals received shall be reviewed to determine those that meet the format requirements and the standards specified in the request for sealed proposals.

(ii) The school district shall evaluate the qualifications of the proposers based solely upon the criteria and evaluation methodology set forth in the request for sealed proposals, and shall assign a best value score to each proposal. Once the evaluation is complete, all responsive proposals shall be ranked from the highest best value to the lowest best value to the school district.

(iii) The award of the instrument shall be made by the governing board of the school district to the responsive proposer whose proposal is determined, in writing by the governing board of the school district, to be the best value to the school district.

(iv) If the selected proposer refuses or fails to execute the tendered instrument, the governing board of the school district may award the instrument to the proposer with the second highest best value score if the governing board of the school district deems it to be for the best interest of the school district. If the second selected proposer refuses or fails to execute the tendered instrument, the governing board of the school district may award the instrument to the proposer with the third highest best value score if the governing board of the school district deems it to be for the best interest of the school district.

(v) Notwithstanding any other law, upon issuance of a contract award, the school district shall publicly announce its award, identifying the entity to which the award is made, along with a statement regarding the basis of the award. The statement regarding the school district’s contract award and the contract file shall provide sufficient information to satisfy an external audit.

(G) The governing board of the school district, at its discretion, may reject all proposals and request new proposals.

(3) Following the award of an instrument created pursuant to paragraph (1), and if the price proposal is not a lump sum for the instrument awarded, the successful proposer shall provide the school district with objectively verifiable information of its costs to perform the services requested under the instrument and shall
 select subcontractors as set forth in paragraph (4). Once any preconstruction services are completed and subcontractors are selected, and upon approval of the plans and specifications for work on the site by the Department of General Services’ Division of the State Architect, if required, the successful proposer and the school district shall finalize the price for the services to be provided under the instrument. The successful proposer shall provide the school district with written rationale for the price, and the school district shall approve or reject the final price at a public meeting before the successful proposer may proceed with any further work under the instrument. The contract file shall include documentation sufficient to support the final price determination.

(4) (A) The school district, in the request for sealed proposals, may identify specific types of subcontractors that must be included in the proposal.
 All subcontractors that are identified in the proposal shall be afforded the protections of the Subletting and Subcontracting Fair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code).

(B) Following the award of an instrument created pursuant to paragraph (1) and for subcontractors not identified in the proposal, the successful proposer shall proceed as follows in awarding construction subcontracts with a value exceeding one-half of 1 percent of the price allocable to construction work:

(i) Provide public notice of availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the school district, including a fixed date and time on which qualifications statements, bids, or proposals will be due.

(ii) Establish reasonable qualification criteria and standards.

(iii) Award the subcontract either on a best value basis or to the lowest responsible bidder. The process may include prequalification or short-listing. The process shall not apply to subcontractors listed in the original proposal. Subcontractors awarded construction subcontracts under this subdivision shall be afforded all the protections of the Subletting and Subcontracting Fair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code).

(5) Paragraph (2) shall not preclude a school district from segregating the request for proposals into a request for qualifications, followed by a request for proposals with price information from the proposers deemed most qualified by the school district, provided that the procedures specified in paragraphs (2), (3), and
 (4) are otherwise followed.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 17297 and 17402, for purposes of using preconstruction services, a school district may enter into an instrument created pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) before written approval by the Department of General Services’ Division of the State Architect only if the instrument provides that no work for which a contractor is required to be licensed in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 7065) of Chapter 9 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code and for which Division of the State Architect approval is required can be performed before receipt of the required Division of the State Architect approval.

(2) This subdivision does not waive the requirements of Section 17072.30 or Section 17074.16, or any other applicable requirements of Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section
 17070.10) of Part 10.

(c) A rental of property that complies with subdivision (a) as it reads on the day that the lease is entered into shall be deemed to have thereby required the payment of adequate consideration for purposes of Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(d) (1) This subdivision shall apply to a project for the construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of any structure, building, or other improvement of any kind that was leased through an instrument pursuant to this section before July 1, 2015. If at any time the instrument is determined to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction because it fails to fall within the competitive bidding exception pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), as it read on December 31, 2016, the contractor who entered into the instrument with the school district may be paid the
 reasonable cost, specifically excluding profit, of the labor, equipment, materials, and services furnished by the contractor before the date of the determination that the instrument is invalid if all of the following conditions, as determined by the court, are met:

(A) The contractor proceeded with construction, alteration, repair, or improvement based upon a good faith belief that the instrument was valid.

(B) The school district has reasonably determined that the work performed is satisfactory.

(C) Contractor fraud did not occur in the obtaining or performance of the instrument.

(D) The instrument does not otherwise violate state law related to the construction or leasing of public works of improvement.

(2) In no event shall payment to the contractor pursuant to this section exceed either of the following:

(A) The contractor’s costs as included in the instrument plus the cost of any approved change orders.

(B) The lease payments made, less profit, at the point in time the instrument is determined to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), this subdivision shall not affect any protest and legal proceedings, whether contractual, administrative, or judicial, to challenge the award of the public works contract, nor affect any rights under Section 337.1 or 337.15 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on
 July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 521, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 5.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 6 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 666.)
-------------------------------------------

17406.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 17417, the governing board of a school district may let, for a minimum rental of one dollar ($1) a year, to any person, firm, or corporation any real property that belongs to the school district if the instrument by which this property is let requires the lessee to construct on the demised premises, or provide for the construction thereon of, a building or buildings for the use of the school district during the term of the lease, and provides that title to that building shall vest in the school district at the expiration of that term. The instrument may provide for the means or methods by which that title shall vest in the school district before the expiration of that term, and shall contain other terms and conditions as the governing board of the school district may deem to be in the best interest of
 the school district.

(b) Any rental of property that complies with subdivision (a) shall be deemed to have thereby required the payment of adequate consideration for purposes of Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 521, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 6.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17407.

(a) The governing board of any school district may enter into an agreement with any person, firm, or corporation under which that person, firm, or corporation shall construct, or provide for the construction of, a building to be used by the district upon a designated site and lease the building and site to the district. The instrument shall provide that the title to the building and site shall vest in the district at the expiration of the lease, and may provide the means or method by which the title to the building and site shall vest in the district prior to the expiration of the lease, and shall contain other terms and conditions as the governing board of the district deems to be in the best interest of the district.
